District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.32

Findings.

The Council finds that:

(1)

The New Convention Center needs a New Convention Center Hotel adjacent to or in close proximity to the New Convention Center.

(2)

Repealed.

(3)

The construction and development of the New Convention Center Hotel will enable the Center to be more competitive in the convention market, attract increased business, provide for additional retail use, and enhance the financial viability of the Center.

(4)

The assemblage of properties within the New Convention Center Hotel Site is necessary to allow for the development of a New Convention Center Hotel.

(5)

The assemblage of properties in the New Convention Center Hotel site and the development of the New Convention Center Hotel is a municipal use that serves many public purposes and is in the interest of, and for the benefit of, the citizens of the District of Columbia.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 232, formerly § 802
as added Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 201, 53 DCR 5430
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-144, § 3(g), 55 DCR 2527
renumbered Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 122(h), 56 DCR 1117
D.C. Law 17-144 repealed par. (2); rewrote par. (3); and, in par. (4), deleted “and for the expansion of the New Convention Center” from the end.
D.C. Law 17-353, in the credit, renumbered the section designation from § 802 to § 232.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 201 of New Convention Center Hotel Omnibus Financing and Development Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-404, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5404).